ro-RO: Compatibil cu forma piscinei: Formă liberă; În formă de rinichi; Oval; Dreptunghiular; Rotund; Pătrat; Altele
ru: Подходит для формы бассейна: Произвольная; Почкообразная; Овальная; Прямоугольная; Круглая; Квадратная; Другое
vi: Phù hợp với hình dạng hồ bơi: Hình thức tự do; Hình thận; Hình trái xoan; Chữ nhật; Tròn; Vuông; Khác
el: Κατάλληλο για σχήμα πισίνας: Ελεύθερης μορφής; Kidney-shaped; Οβάλ; Ορθογώνια; Στρογγυλή; Τετράγωνη; Άλλο
da: Passer til følgende poolform: Fri form; Nyreformet; Oval; Rektangulær; Rund; Firkant; Andet
en: Suitable for pool shape: Free-form; Kidney-shaped; Oval; Rectangular; Round; Square; Other
zh-TW: 適用於泳池形狀: 自由造型; 腎形; 橢圓形; 長方形; 圓形; 方形; 其他
cs: Vhodný tvar bazénu: Nepravidelné; Ledvinovitý tvar; Oválné; Obdélné; Kruhové; Čtvercové; Jiné
nl: Geschikt voor zwembadvorm: Vrije vorm; Niervormig; Ovaal; Rechthoekig; Rond; Vierkant; Overig
fr: Compatible avec la forme de la piscine: Forme libre; En forme de rein; Oval; Rectangulaire; Rond; Carré; Autre
fi: Soveltuu altaan muotoon: Vapaa muoto; Munuaisen muotoinen; Soikea; Suorakulmainen; Pyöreä; Neliömäinen; Muu
hu: Alkalmas a medenceformához: Szabad formájú; Vesealakú; Ovális; Téglalap; Kerek; Négyzet; Egyéb
it: Forma di piscina per cui è idoneo: Forma irregolare; A forma di rene; Ovale; Rettangolare; Rotondo; Quadrato; Altro
bg-BG: Подходящ за формата на басейна: Свободна форма; Бъбрековидна; Овална; Правоъгълна; Кръгла; Квадрат; Друго
zh-CN: 适用泳池形状: 自由形式; 肾形; 椭圆形; 矩形; 圆形; 方形; 其他
es: Adecuado para la forma de la piscina: Forma libre; En forma de riñón; Ovalado; Rectangular; Redondo; Cuadrado; Otros
tr: Uygun havuz şekli: Serbest form; Böbrek şekilli; Oval; Dikdörtgen; Yuvarlak; Kare; Diğer
nb: Passer til bassengform: Friform; Nyreformet; Oval; Rektangulær; Rund; Firkantet; Annet
pl: Kształt odpowiedni do basenu: Nieregularne; Kształt nerki; Owalne; Prostokątne; Okrągłe; Kwadratowe; Inne
sk-SK: Vhodné pre tvar bazéna: Voľná forma; V tvare obličky; Ovál; Obdĺžnik; Okrúhly; Hranatý; Iné
pt-PT: Adequado para o formato da piscina: Forma livre; Em forma de rim; Oval; Retangular; Redondo; Quadrado; Outro
th: เหมาะสำหรับรูปทรงสระว่ายน้ำ: รูปทรงอิสระ; รูปไต; รูปไข่; สี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ทรงกลม; สี่เหลี่ยมจัตุรัส; อื่นๆ
de: Eignung für Poolform: Freiform; Nierenförmig; Oval; Rechteckig; Kreis; Quadrat; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Oblik bazena za koji je prikladno: Neodređenog oblika; Bubrežasti; Ovalno; Pravokutni; Okrugla; Kvadratno; Ostalo
pt-BR: Adequado para o formato de piscina: Forma livre; Em forma de rim; Oval; Retangular; Redondo; Quadrado; Outro
lt-LT: Tinka baseino formai: Laisva forma; Pupelės formos; Ovalas; Stačiakampis; Apvali; Kvadratinė; Kita
sv: Passar för poolform: Fri form; Njurformad; Oval; Rektangulär; Rund; Fyrkantig; Annat
ja: プールの形状に適応: 自由形状; ビーンズ型; 楕円形; 長方形; 丸形; 正方形; その他
ko: 수영장 형태 적합 여부: 자유 형식; 신장 모양; 타원형; 직사각형; 라운드; 스퀘어; 기타
sl-SI: Primerno za obliko bazena: Prosta oblika; Ledvičasta; Ovalno; Pravokotno; Okrogel; Kvadratna; Druga